Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.175

Recycled materials—Study code and adopt changes.

The state building code council, in consultation with the department of ecology and local governments, shall conduct a study of the state building code, and adopt changes as necessary to encourage greater use of recycled building materials from construction and building demolition debris, mixed waste paper, waste paint, waste plastics, and other waste materials.

[ 1991 c 297 s 15.]